Washington statutes.
RCW 6.21.060

Amount of property to be sold—Officers and deputies may not purchase.

After sufficient property has been sold to satisfy the execution, no more shall be sold. Neither the officer holding the execution nor his or her deputy shall become a purchaser or be interested in any purchase at the sale.

[ 1987 c 442 s 606.]